Illinois, session 104th, HB2774.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Domestic Violence Shelters Act is amended 5by changing Section 1 and by adding Section 3a as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 1310/1)  (from Ch. 40, par. 2401)7    Sec. 1. The terms used in this Act shall have the following 8meanings ascribed to them:9    "Department" means the Department of Human Services. 10    (a) "Domestic violence" means attempting to cause or 11causing abuse of a family or household member or high-risk 12adult with disabilities, or attempting to cause or causing 13neglect or exploitation of a high-risk adult with disabilities 14which threatens the adult's health and safety, as defined in 15Section 103 of the Illinois Domestic Violence Act of 1986.16    "Domestic Violence services" means information and 17referral services provided through the use of the Domestic 18Violence Hotline and intended to promote and provide access to 19domestic violence services. 20    (b) "Family or household member" means a spouse, person 21living as a spouse, parent, or other adult person related by 22consanguinity or affinity, who is residing or has resided with 23the person committing domestic violence. "Family or household   HB2774 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 06910 KTG 16946 b1member" includes a high-risk adult with disabilities who 2resides with or receives care from any person who has the 3responsibility for a high-risk adult as a result of a family 4relationship or who has assumed responsibility for all or a 5portion of the care of an adult with disabilities voluntarily, 6by express or implied contract, or by court order.7    "Lead entity" means an Illinois 501(c)(3) non-profit 8agency or organization designated by the Department to manage 9use of the Domestic Violence Hotline for the purpose of 10providing the public access to information about domestic 11violence services. 12    (c) "Shelter" means a facility including, but not limited 13to, a facility providing temporary residential facilities to 14family or household members who are victims of domestic 15violence and their children and to high-risk adults with 16disabilities.17    (d) "High-risk adult with disabilities" means a person 18aged 18 or over whose physical or mental disability impairs 19his or her ability to seek or obtain protection from abuse, 20neglect, or exploitation.21(Source: P.A. 86-542.) 22    (20 ILCS 1310/3a new)23    Sec. 3a. Domestic Violence Hotline.24    (a) The Department of Human Services shall be responsible 25for the provision of a single, easy to use telephone number for   HB2774 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 06910 KTG 16946 b1public access to information and referral for domestic 2violence services. Subject to subsection (e), the Department 3is authorized to identify and enter into a contract with a lead 4entity to provide governance and oversight, including the 5ability to design, implement, support, and coordinate a 6State-wide Domestic Violence Hotline system.7    (b) Qualifications for identification of the lead entity 8shall include:9        (1) Ability to provide statewide, toll-free, 24-hour, 10    7 day-a-week, multi-lingual, confidential referral 11    services to victims and perpetrators of domestic violence 12    and information to people calling on behalf of a victim, 13    including friends or family of the domestic violence 14    victim and first responders such as the police.15        (2) Has a record of providing effective, 16    victim-centered referral services to victims of domestic 17    violence for at least 2 years prior to the effective date 18    of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly.19        (3) Has provided 40 hours of training in domestic 20    violence to all of its direct staff and volunteers. Staff 21    trained after July 1, 2004, must be trained by a site 22    approved by the Illinois Certified Domestic Violence 23    Professionals.24        (4) Must be an Illinois 501(c)(3) non-profit agency or 25    organization.26        (5) Ability to provide an independent audit at the   HB2774 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 06910 KTG 16946 b1    time of application.2        (6) Provides 24-hour telephone accessibility by 3    personnel trained in domestic violence without requiring 4    the victim to make a second phone call or wait for a return 5    phone call.6        (7) Provides victims' access and direct referrals to 7    the Department's funded domestic violence providers via a 8    three-way phone linkage.9        (8) Has adequate staffing to make referrals to 10    domestic violence service agencies, identify 11    non-traditional domestic violence services, provide safety 12    planning or tips, and help victims explore service options 13    including for those living in remote areas of the State 14    and for those for whom English is not their primary 15    language.16        (9) Provides the most up-to-date technology to 17    increase access to domestic violence services for the deaf 18    and hard of hearing.19        (10) Demonstrated expertise or experience, or both, in 20    planning for a statewide information and referral system.21    (c) The lead entity shall encourage the orderly and 22efficient use of the Domestic Violence Hotline to:23        (1) provide access to referrals for domestic violence 24    services 24/7; and25        (2) collect needed information about the demand for 26    and delivery of domestic violence services across   HB2774 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 06910 KTG 16946 b1    Illinois.2    (d) The lead entity shall provide periodic programmatic 3and fiscal reports on activities, accomplishments, and other 4issues to the Department.5    (e) In awarding the contract under subsection (a), the 6Department shall ensure that the Domestic Violence Hotline 7lead entity has the organizational capacity to carry out the 8terms of the contract.9    (f) Nothing in this Act is intended to limit sources of 10funding to support the operation of the Domestic Violence 11Hotline.